src/fst/morphology/affixes/digits.lexc
LEXICON DIGITS_KOLMAS
!! The digit string ending in 3, 6, 8, 00 or 2 pronounced as ordinal
!!€ 3.:
!!€ 3:s:
!!€ 3:tta:
+Sg+Nom:.    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:s  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT    ;
+Pl+Nom:%:nnet DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:nnen DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:tta    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:nteen   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:nnetta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:nnelta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:nnella   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:nnelle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:nnesta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:ntena    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:nnessa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:nneksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:nnekse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:nsia    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:nsiin   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:nsitta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:nsilta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:nsilla  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:nsille  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:nsina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:nsine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:nsista  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:nsisss  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:nsin    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:nsiksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:nsikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_NELJÄS
!! The digit string ending in 4, 5, 7, 9, 0, or 1. pronounced as ordinal
!!€ 4.:
!!€ 4:s:
!!€ 4:ttä:
+Sg+Nom:.    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:s  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT    ;
+Pl+Nom:%:nnet DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:nnen DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:ttä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:nteen   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:nnettä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:nneltä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:nnellä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:nnelle   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:nnestä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:ntenä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:nnessä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:nneksi   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:nnekse   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:nsia    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:nsiin   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:nsittä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:nsiltä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:nsillä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:nsille  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:nsinä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:nsine  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:nsistä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:nsissä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:nsin    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:nsiksi  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:nsikse  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_ROMANS_TOINEN
!! The roman digit string ending in II, III, VI, VIII, C, L or M
!!€ II:
!!€ II:ta:
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_POSS    ;
+Pl+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT ;
+Sg+Par:%:ta    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:een   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:tta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:lta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:lla   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:na    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:ia    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:itta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:ilta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:ina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:ista  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_ROMANS_ENSIMMÄINEN
!! The roman digit string ending in I, IV, V, VII, IX, X or 
!!€ I:
!!€ I:tä:
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:s  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT    ;
+Pl+Nom:%:nnet DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:nnen DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:tä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:nteen   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:nnettä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:nneltä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:nnellä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:nnelle   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:nnestä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:ntenä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:nnessä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:nneksi   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:nnekse   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:nsiä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:nsiin   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:nsittä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:nsiltä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:nsillä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:nsille  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:nsinä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:nsine  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:nsistä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:nsissä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:nsin    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:nsiksi  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:nsikse  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL    ;

! possessives
LEXICON DIGITS_FRONT_POSS
!!€ 1:nsä:
+PxSg1:%>ni  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsä DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsä DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON DIGITS_BACK_POSS
!!€ 2:nsa:
+PxSg1:%>ni  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsa DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsa DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN
!!€ 3:aan:
+PxSg3:%>an    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>an    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN
!!€ 2:kseen:
+PxSg3:%>en    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN
!!€ 1:kseen:
+PxSg3:%>en    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN
!!€ 5:ttään:
+PxSg3:%>än    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>än    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON DIGITS_BACK_CLIT
!!€ 2:han:
+Foc/han:%>han   #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>hankaan  #        ;
+Foc/han+Qst:%>hanko #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>hanpa #        ;
+Qst:%>ko #        ;
+Qst+Foc/han:%>kohan #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>kokaan    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kin:%>kokin    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/pa:%>kopa   #        ;
+Qst+Foc/s:%>kos    #        ;
+Foc/pa:%>pa #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pahan #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pakaan    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pakin    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Qst:%>pako   #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pas    #        ;
+Foc/kin:%>kin  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kinhan  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kinkaan #        ;
+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kinko    #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kinpa    #        ;
+Foc/kaan:%>kaan  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kaanhan  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kaankin #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>kaanko    #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kaanpa    #        ;
