src/fst/morphology/stems/digits.lexc
LEXICON DIGITS_ONWARDS !! **@CODE@** is for entries not looping back 
1+Num+Ord:1   DIGITS_NELJÄS  ; ! yhdes
2+Num+Ord:2   DIGITS_KOLMAS ; ! kahdes
3+Num+Ord:3   DIGITS_KOLMAS ;
4+Num+Ord:4   DIGITS_NELJÄS ;
5+Num+Ord:5   DIGITS_NELJÄS ;
6+Num+Ord:6   DIGITS_KOLMAS ;
7+Num+Ord:7   DIGITS_NELJÄS ;
8+Num+Ord:8   DIGITS_KOLMAS ;
9+Num+Ord:9   DIGITS_NELJÄS  ;
1%0+Num+Ord:1%0  DIGITS_NELJÄS  ;
2%0+Num+Ord:2%0  DIGITS_NELJÄS  ;
3%0+Num+Ord:3%0  DIGITS_NELJÄS  ;
4%0+Num+Ord:4%0  DIGITS_NELJÄS  ;
5%0+Num+Ord:5%0  DIGITS_NELJÄS  ;
6%0+Num+Ord:6%0  DIGITS_NELJÄS  ;
7%0+Num+Ord:7%0  DIGITS_NELJÄS  ;
8%0+Num+Ord:8%0  DIGITS_NELJÄS  ;
9%0+Num+Ord:9%0  DIGITS_NELJÄS  ;
1%0%0+Num+Ord:1%0%0   DIGITS_KOLMAS   ;
2%0%0+Num+Ord:2%0%0   DIGITS_KOLMAS  ;
3%0%0+Num+Ord:3%0%0   DIGITS_KOLMAS  ;
4%0%0+Num+Ord:4%0%0   DIGITS_KOLMAS  ;
5%0%0+Num+Ord:5%0%0   DIGITS_KOLMAS  ;
6%0%0+Num+Ord:6%0%0   DIGITS_KOLMAS  ;
7%0%0+Num+Ord:7%0%0   DIGITS_KOLMAS  ;
8%0%0+Num+Ord:8%0%0   DIGITS_KOLMAS  ;
9%0%0+Num+Ord:9%0%0   DIGITS_KOLMAS  ;
1%0%0%0+Num+Ord:1%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
2%0%0%0+Num+Ord:2%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
3%0%0%0+Num+Ord:3%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
4%0%0%0+Num+Ord:4%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
5%0%0%0+Num+Ord:5%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
6%0%0%0+Num+Ord:6%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
7%0%0%0+Num+Ord:7%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
8%0%0%0+Num+Ord:8%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
9%0%0%0+Num+Ord:9%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
1%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:1%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
2%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:2%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
3%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:3%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
4%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:4%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
5%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:5%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
6%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:6%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
7%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:7%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
8%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:8%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
9%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:9%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
1%0%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:1%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
2%0%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:2%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
3%0%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:3%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
4%0%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:4%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
5%0%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:5%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
6%0%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:6%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
7%0%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:7%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
8%0%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:8%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
9%0%0%0%0%0+Num+Ord:9%0%0%0%0%0 DIGITS_KOLMAS    ;
